Hawaii statutes.
[§481L-1] Definitions. Whenever
used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adjusted capitalized cost" means the
gross capitalized cost, less the capitalized cost reduction, and is the amount
used by the retail lessor in calculating the base periodic payment in the lease
agreement.

"Capitalized cost reduction" means
the total amount of any rebate, cash payment, net trade-in allowance, check,
credit card debit, and noncash credit or downpayment that reduces the gross
capitalized cost, but does not include any periodic lease payments due at the
inception of the lease or all of the periodic lease payments if they are paid
at the inception of the lease.

"Clear and conspicuous" means that
written disclosures shall be made in a manner that is readable and
understandable to the retail lessee and oral disclosures shall be made in a
manner that is audible and understandable to the retail lessee.

"Gross capitalized cost" means the
amount agreed upon by the retail lessor and the retail lessee as the value of
the motor vehicle and any items that are capitalized or amortized during the
lease term, including but not limited to taxes, insurance, service agreements,
registration fees, license fees, lease acquisition and administration fees,
warranty charges, fees and charges for accessories and for installing
accessories, charges for delivery, service and repair, charges for improving
the motor vehicle and providing other services incidental to the agreement, the
outstanding balance of a prior loan agreement, lease or motor vehicle retail
installment contract, and the unpaid portion of the early termination
obligation under an outstanding lease agreement.

"Lease agreement" means a written
agreement for the transfer from a retail lessor to a retail lessee of the right
to possess and use a motor vehicle in exchange for consideration for a
scheduled term exceeding four months, whether or not the retail lessee has the
option to purchase or otherwise become the owner of the motor vehicle upon
expiration of the agreement. The term does not include an agreement which
covers an absolute sale, a sale pending approval, or a retail installment sale.

"Lease transaction" means a
presentation made to the retail lessee concerning the motor vehicle, including
a sales presentation or a document presented to the retail lessee, resulting in
the execution of a lease agreement.

"Motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle
as defined in section 286-2.

"Retail lessee" means an individual
who executes a lease agreement for a motor vehicle from a retail lessor
primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

"Retail lessor" means a person who
regularly engages in the business of selling or leasing motor vehicles and who
offers or arranges a lease agreement for a motor vehicle. The term includes an
agent or affiliate who acts on behalf of the retail lessor.

"Worksheet" means the primary
document or documents used by the retail lessor to derive the monthly lease
payment for a specific lease transaction. [L 1997, c 82, pt of §1]

Cross References

Lessee, defined:

Lemon law, §481I-2.

Motor vehicle rental, §437D-3.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next